Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4508
Inaudible portions; how treated.

The existence of inaudible portions of an electronic recording, which are not the result of bad faith by a law enforcement officer to produce an inaudible result, standing alone, shall not render a statement out of compliance with section 29-4503.

Laws 2008, LB179, § 8.